Virginia statutes. Title 22.1. Education.
Article 1.2. Establishment of Charter Schools.
§ 22.1-212.11.
Public charter school restrictions.

Local school boards may establish public charter schools within the school division. Priority shall be given to public charter school applications designed to increase the educational opportunities of at-risk students, and at least one-half of the public charter schools per division shall be designed for at-risk students; however, the one-half requirement shall not apply in cases in which an existing public school is converted into a public charter school that serves the same community as the existing public school, nor shall such public charter school conversions be counted in the determination of school division compliance with the one-half requirement.

Local school boards shall report the grant or denial of public charter school applications to the Board and shall specify the maximum number of charters that may be authorized, if any; the number of charters granted or denied; and whether a public charter school is designed to increase the educational opportunities of at-risk students.

Nothing in this article shall be construed to prevent a school that is the only school in the division from applying to become a public charter school.

History.

1998, cc. 748, 890; 2000, cc. 631, 1028; 2002, cc. 851, 874; 2004, c. 530; 2009, c. 441; 2014, cc. 645, 693.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2004, c. 530, cl. 2, as amended by Acts 2009, c. 441, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act amending and reenacting §§ 22.1-212.5, 22.1-212.6, 22.1-212.8, and 22.1-212.11 shall expire on July 1, 2009.” The section above is set out without amendments by Acts 2004, c. 530.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 851, in subsection A, substituted ‘Local school boards‘ for ‘On and after July 1, 1998, local school boards electing to receive applications for public charter schools pursuant to § 22.1-212.9‘; in subsection B, substituted ‘shall report the grant or denial of‘ for ‘that grant‘ following ‘boards,‘ deleted ‘shall report such action‘ following ‘applications,‘ and inserted ‘or denied‘ following ‘granted.‘

The 2002 amendment by c. 874 made the same changes to subsection B as were made by Acts 2002, c. 851.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 530 rewrote subsection A, which read: “Local school boards may establish public charter schools within the school division and shall be authorized to limit the number of schools so established; however, the total number of public charter schools, including those designed to increase educational opportunities for at-risk pupils but not including any regional public charter schools, shall not exceed ten percent of the school division’s total number of schools or two public charter schools, whichever is greater. Priority shall be given to public charter school applications designed to increase the educational opportunities of at-risk students, and at least one-half of the public charter schools per division shall be for at-risk students.”, in subsection B, deleted “and shall specify the maximum number of charters that my be authorized, if any” after “the Board” and added “or any students served by schools that have not achieved full accreditation” at the end, and added the the second paragraph. For expiration date, see Editor’s note.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 441 deleted “and shall be authorized to limit the number of schools so established; however, the total number of public charter schools, including those designed to increase educational opportunities for at risk pupils but not including any regional public charter schools, shall not exceed ten percent of the school division’s total number of schools or two public charter schools, whichever is greater” from the end of the first sentence in subsection A.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendments by cc. 645 and 693 are identical and, in subsection A, inserted “designed” following “shall be” and “however, the one-half requirement shall not apply in cases in which an existing public school is converted into a public charter school that serves the same community as the existing public school, nor shall such public charter school conversions be counted in the determination of school division compliance with the one-half requirement,” and made a minor stylistic change.

§ 22.1-212.12.
Public charter school term; renewals and revocations.

A charter may be approved or renewed for a period not to exceed five school years. A public charter school renewal application submitted to the local school board or, in the case of a regional public charter school, to the relevant school boards shall contain:

A report on the progress of the public charter school in achieving the goals, objectives, program and performance standards for students, and such other conditions and terms as the school board or boards may require upon granting initial approval of the charter application.

A financial statement, on forms prescribed by the Board, that discloses the costs of administration, instruction, and other spending categories for the public charter school and that has been concisely and clearly written to enable the school board or boards and the public to compare such costs to those of other schools or comparable organizations.

Local school boards may revoke a charter if the public charter school:

Violates the conditions, standards, or procedures established in the public charter school application;

Fails to meet or make reasonable progress toward achievement of the content standards or student performance standards identified in the charter application;

Fails to meet generally accepted standards of fiscal management; or

Violates any provision of law from which the public charter school was not specifically exempted.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to restrict the authority of local school boards to decline to renew a charter agreement.

History.

1998, cc. 748, 890; 2000, cc. 631, 1028; 2002, c. 851; 2004, c. 530; 2012, cc. 702, 720.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2004, c. 530, amended subsection A and in cl. 2 of that act, provided that the amendments would expire July 1, 2009. Acts 2004, c. 530, cl. 2, as amended by Acts 2009, c. 441, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act amending and reenacting §§ 22.1-212.5, 22.1-212.6, 22.1-212.8, and 22.1-212.11 shall expire on July 1, 2009.” Therefore, the amendments to subsection A did not expire July 1, 2009.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendments by cc. 631 and 1028 are identical, and inserted “public” preceding “charter school” throughout the section; inserted “or, in the case of a regional public charter school, to the participating school boards” in the second sentence of the introductory language of subsection A; inserted “or boards” in subdivisions A 1 and A 2; substituted “Local school boards” for A local school board” in the introductory language of subsection B; and added the language beginning “or, in the case” in subdivision B 4; and substituted “local school boards” for “the local school board” in subsection C.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 851 substituted “relevant” for “participating” preceding “school boards” in the second sentence of the introductory paragraph of subsection A.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 530 substituted “five school years” for “three school years” in subsection A. For expiration date, see Editor’s note.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 702 and 720 are identical, and deleted the former concluding paragraph of subsection B.

§ 22.1-212.13.
Employment of professional, licensed personnel.

At the discretion of the local school board, charter school personnel may be employees of the local school board, or boards, granting the charter. Any personnel not employed by the local school board shall remain subject to the provisions of §§ 22.1-296.1, 22.1-296.2, and 22.1-296.4.

Professional, licensed education personnel may volunteer for assignment to a public charter school. Assignment in a public charter school shall be for one contract year. Upon request of the employee and the recommendation of the management committee of the public charter school, reassignment to the public charter school shall occur on an annual basis.

At the completion of each contract year, professional, licensed education personnel who request assignment to a public noncharter school in the relevant school division or who are not recommended for reassignment in the public charter school, other than for the grounds cited in § 22.1-307, shall be guaranteed an involuntary transfer to a public noncharter school in the school division according to the employment policies of the school division.

Professional, licensed personnel of a public charter school shall be granted the same employment benefits given to professional, licensed personnel in public noncharter schools in accordance with the policies of the relevant school board or boards.

School boards may employ such health, mental health, social services, and other related personnel to serve in residential charter schools for at-risk pupils as set forth in the charter agreement between such school board and the charter school; however, nothing herein shall require a school board to fund the residential or other services provided by a residential charter school.

History.

1998, cc. 748, 890; 2000, cc. 631, 712, 1028; 2012, cc. 702, 720; 2016, c. 770.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendments by cc. 631 and 1028 are identical, and inserted “public” preceding “charter school” throughout the section; inserted “public” preceding “noncharter school” throughout the section; inserted “or boards” in subsection A; inserted “relevant” in subsection C; and added “in accordance with the policies of the relevant school board or boards.” at the end of subsection D.

The 2000 amendment by c. 712 inserted “education” following “licensed” in subsections B and C; and added subsection F.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 702 and 720 are identical, and rewrote subsection A.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 770 deleted former subsection E, which read: “Nothing in this section shall be construed to restrict the authority of the local school board to assign professional, licensed personnel to a public charter school or any other public school as provided in §§ 22.1-293 and 22.1-295”, and redesignated former subsection E as subsection F.

Law Review.

For 2000 survey of Virginia law regarding children, see 34 U. Rich. L. Rev. 939 (2000).

§ 22.1-212.14.
Funding of public charter schools; services provided.

For the purposes of this article, students enrolled in a public charter school shall be included in the average daily membership of the relevant school division and shall be reported in fall membership for purposes of calculating the state and local shares required to fund the Standards of Quality.

Insofar as constitutionally valid, a local school board or, in the case of a regional public charter school, the relevant school boards may establish by contract an agreement stating the conditions for funding the public charter school, including funding for the educational program to be provided by a residential charter school for at-risk students. In accordance with subsection D, the per pupil funding provided to the charter school by the local school board or, in the case of a regional public charter school, the relevant school boards, shall be negotiated in the charter agreement and shall be commensurate with the average school-based costs of educating the students in the existing schools in the division or divisions unless the cost of operating the charter school is less than that average school-based cost.

Services provided the public charter school by the local school board or the relevant school boards, in the case of regional public charter schools, may include food services; custodial and maintenance services; curriculum, media, and library services; warehousing and merchandising; and such other services not prohibited by the provisions of this article or state and federal laws.

Funding and service agreements between local school boards and public charter schools shall not provide a financial incentive or constitute a financial disincentive to the establishment of a public charter school, including any regional public charter school.

Any educational and related fees collected from students enrolled at a public charter school shall be credited to the account of such public charter school established by the relevant local school board.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the proportionate share of state and federal resources allocated for students with disabilities and school personnel assigned to special education programs shall be directed to public charter schools enrolling such students. The proportionate share of moneys allocated under other federal or state categorical aid programs shall be directed to public charter schools serving students eligible for such aid.

The management committee of a public charter school is authorized to accept gifts, donations, or grants of any kind made to the public charter school and to spend such funds in accordance with the conditions prescribed by the donor. However, no gift, donation, or grant shall be accepted by the management committee of a public charter school if the conditions for such funds are contrary to law or the terms of the agreement between the local school board and the public charter school or, in the case of a regional public charter school, the relevant school boards and the regional public charter school.

The Department of Education shall provide technical assistance to local school boards relating to receipt, review, and ruling upon applications for public charter schools.

History.

1998, cc. 748, 890; 2000, cc. 631, 712, 1028; 2002, c. 851; 2012, cc. 702, 720.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendments by cc. 631 and 1028 are identical, and inserted “public” preceding “charter” throughout the section; and substituted “such relevant school division” for “the school division” in the third sentence of the first paragraph.

The 2000 amendment by c. 712 added the language beginning “including funding” through the end of subsection B.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 851, in subsection A, substituted “and shall” for “however, public charter schools shall not” following “division,” and deleted “if the enrollment at the public charter school is less than 100 students and constitutes less than five percent of the total enrollment of the relevant grades in that school division” at the end of that subsection; substituted “relevant” for “participating” in subsection B; in subsection C, substituted “the relevant school boards, in the case of regional public charter schools” for “participating school boards”; substituted “relevant” for “participating” in the last sentence of subsection G; and in subsection H, substituted “relating to receipt, review, and ruling” for “electing to review, and act.”

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 702 and 720 are identical, and added the second sentence of subsection B.

Law Review.

For 2000 survey of Virginia law regarding children, see 34 U. Rich. L. Rev. 939 (2000).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Americans with Disabilities Act compliance. —

Provision of the charter agreement that requires a charter school to expend funds in order to make the building compliant with the Americans with Disabilities Act as a precondition to opening its doors does not conflict with subsection D of § 22.1-212.14. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Joseph D. Morrissey, Member, House of Delegates, 10-010, 2010 Va. AG LEXIS 9 (3/4/10).

“Start-up” costs for public charter school. —

The provision of the charter school agreement that requires that certain “start-up” costs be paid out of private funds raised by the school and not from the per-student state and local funding allocated to the school by the school board does not conflict with subsection D of § 22.1-212.14. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable G. Manoli Loupassi, Member, House of Delegates, 10-014, 2010 Va. AG LEXIS 16 (4/20/10).

§ 22.1-212.15.
Report of public charter schools.

The Board shall report the number of public charter schools established in the Commonwealth, as well as the number of charters denied, in its annual report to the Governor and the General Assembly pursuant to § 22.1-18.

History.

1998, cc. 748, 890; 2000, cc. 631, 1028; 2002, cc. 851, 874; 2010, c. 61.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendments by cc. 631 and 1028 are identical, and inserted “public” preceding “charter” throughout the section; substituted “such relevant” for “the” in the third sentence of the first paragraph.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 851, in the first paragraph, substituted “shall submit annual evaluations of any public charter schools” for “establishing public charter schools shall submit annual evaluations of such schools” in the first sentence, and deleted “Such” at the beginning of the last sentence; and deleted “beginning in January 1999” at the end of the last paragraph.

The 2002 amendment by c. 874 substituted “shall submit annual evaluations of any public charter schools” for “establishing public charter schools shall submit annual evaluations of such schools” in the first sentence of the first paragraph; and inserted “as well as the number of charters denied” in the second paragraph.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 61 rewrote the section.

§ 22.1-212.16.
Immunity.

Public charter schools shall be immune from liability to the same extent as all other public schools in the Commonwealth, and the employees and volunteers in a public charter school are immune from liability to the same extent as the employees and volunteers in a public school.

History.

2002, c. 874.